Colorado, session 2026A, HB1308.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add part 5 to article
35 of title 29 as follows:
PART 5
LOT SPLITTING
29-35-501. Legislative declaration.
(1) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES THAT:
(a) THE DIVISION OF AN EXISTING RESIDENTIAL LOT RESULTING IN
THE CREATION OF ONE ADDITIONAL RESIDENTIAL LOT PROVIDES
MEANINGFUL BENEFITS TO BOTH CURRENT PROPERTY OWNERS AND
-2- 1308

PROSPECTIVE HOMEBUYERS. ADMINISTRATIVE LOT SPLITTING CAN
PROVIDE EXISTING HOMEOWNERS WITH THE FLEXIBILITY NEEDED TO
ADAPT TO CHANGING LIFE CIRCUMSTANCES SUCH AS AGING IN PLACE,
MULTIGENERATIONAL LIVING, AND OTHER CHANGES IN FINANCIAL NEEDS
WHILE MAINTAINING HOMEOWNERSHIP. LOT SPLITTING, PARTNERED WITH
A LOW MINIMUM LOT SIZE, CAN EXPAND ATTAINABLE HOMEOWNERSHIP
OPPORTUNITIES FOR FIRST-TIME HOMEBUYERS AND HOMEBUYERS WITH
MODERATE-INCOMES;
(b) THE NEED FOR ADDITIONAL HOUSING UNITS ACROSS THE STATE
REMAINS URGENT. ACCORDING TO THE COLORADO STATE DEMOGRAPHY
OFFICE IN ITS SEPTEMBER 2025 RESEARCH BRIEF TITLED "COLORADO'S
HOUSING SHORTFALL: AN ESTIMATE AND REVIEW OF EXISTING STUDIES,"
THE STATE'S HOUSING SHORTFALL IS ESTIMATED AT APPROXIMATELY ONE
HUNDRED SIX THOUSAND UNITS. BASED ON THE MOST RECENT POPULATION
PROJECTIONS BY THE COLORADO STATE DEMOGRAPHY OFFICE, THE STATE
MUST ADD APPROXIMATELY THIRTY-FOUR THOUSAND ONE HUNDRED NEW
HOUSING UNITS ANNUALLY OVER THE NEXT DECADE TO PREVENT AN
INCREASE IN THE EXISTING HOUSING SHORTFALL;
(c) ACCORDING TO DATA FROM THE FEDERAL HOUSING FINANCE
AGENCY AND THE U.S. BUREAU OF ECONOMIC ANALYSIS, HOUSING COSTS
IN COLORADO HAVE RISEN AT A RATE THAT OUTPACES INCOME GROWTH,
SUCH THAT IN 2023, HOME PRICES WERE APPROXIMATELY TWO HUNDRED
TWENTY-THREE PERCENT ABOVE THEIR 2000 VALUES, WHILE MEDIAN
INCOMES INCREASED BY ONLY ONE HUNDRED FORTY-FOUR PERCENT
DURING THE SAME PERIOD;
(d) ABSENT FROM SUSTAINED STRATEGIC ACTION TO INCREASE
HOUSING PRODUCTION AND ADDRESS SUPPLY BARRIERS, THE GAP BETWEEN
-3- 1308

HOUSING SUPPLY AND DEMAND WILL CONTINUE TO WIDEN, ADVERSELY
AFFECTING AFFORDABILITY, ECONOMIC STABILITY, WORKFORCE
RETENTION, AND COMMUNITY WELL-BEING THROUGHOUT THE STATE;
(e) ENTRY-LEVEL STARTER HOMES SERVE AN ESSENTIAL FUNCTION
IN THE HOUSING MARKET. STARTER HOMES, TYPICALLY UNDERSTOOD AS
HOMES WITH LESS THAN ONE THOUSAND FOUR HUNDRED SQUARE FEET,
ENABLE HOMEOWNERS TO BUILD EQUITY, ESTABLISH LONG-TERM
STABILITY, AND SHELTER HOMEOWNERS FROM SOME INFLATIONARY
PRESSURES, THEREBY CONTRIBUTING TO COMMUNITY RESILIENCE;
(f) THERE IS A CRITICAL NEED TO INCREASE THE PRODUCTION AND
AVAILABILITY OF STARTER HOMES. AS REPORTED BY THE PEW RESEARCH
CENTER, NATIONAL TRENDS INDICATE THAT THE REDUCTION IN NEW
HOUSING DEVELOPMENT HAS BEEN MOST PRONOUNCED AMONG STARTER
HOMES. ACCORDING TO THE FEDERAL HOME LOAN MORTGAGE
CORPORATION IN A RESEARCH BRIEF TITLED "HOUSING SUPPLY: A
GROWING DEFICIT," THE SHARE OF ENTRY-LEVEL HOMES IN OVERALL
RESIDENTIAL CONSTRUCTION HAS DECLINED FROM APPROXIMATELY FORTY
PERCENT IN THE EARLY 1980S TO APPROXIMATELY SEVEN PERCENT IN
2019;
(g) ACCESS TO AFFORDABLE HOMEOWNERSHIP GENERALLY YIELDS
BENEFITS BEYOND PROVIDING SHELTER. ACCORDING TO HABITAT FOR
HUMANITY, CHILDREN IN FAMILIES THAT OWN THEIR HOMES ARE MORE
LIKELY TO COMPLETE HIGH SCHOOL AND PURSUE POST-SECONDARY
EDUCATION COMPARED TO THEIR PEERS IN FAMILIES THAT RENT HOMES.
ADDITIONALLY, HOMEOWNERSHIP CORRELATES WITH GREATER CIVIC AND
SOCIAL ENGAGEMENT, INCLUDING INCREASED LIKELIHOOD OF VOTING IN
LOCAL ELECTIONS AND PARTICIPATING IN NEIGHBORHOOD AND
-4- 1308

COMMUNITY ASSOCIATIONS; AND
(h) LAND COSTS ARE AN IMPORTANT CONTRIBUTOR TO OVERALL
HOUSING COSTS, AND ENABLING LARGER LOTS TO BE SUBDIVIDED AND
SHARED BETWEEN MULTIPLE HOMES SUPPORTS THE CREATION OF STARTER
HOMES AND LOWER-COST HOUSING.
(2) THEREFORE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS, DETERMINES, AND
DECLARES THAT:
(a) THE AVAILABILITY OF AFFORDABLE HOUSING IS A MATTER OF
MIXED STATEWIDE AND LOCAL CONCERN;
(b) COLORADO HAS A LEGITIMATE STATE INTEREST IN MANAGING
POPULATION AND DEVELOPMENT GROWTH AND ENSURING A STABLE
QUALITY AND QUANTITY OF HOUSING FOR ALL COLORADANS, AS THIS IS
AMONG THE MOST PRESSING PROBLEMS CURRENTLY FACING COMMUNITIES
THROUGHOUT THE STATE; AND
(c) LOCAL GOVERNMENT POLICIES THAT LIMIT THE CONSTRUCTION
OF A DIVERSE RANGE OF HOUSING IN AREAS SERVED BY INFRASTRUCTURE
EFFECTIVELY CREATE HOUSING SUPPLY SHORTFALLS AND UNSUSTAINABLE
DEVELOPMENT PATTERNS, AND THEREFORE REQUIRE A STATEWIDE
SOLUTION.
29-35-502. Definitions.
AS USED IN THIS PART 5, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(1) "EVIDENCE OF DEBT" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION
38-38-100.3 (8).
(2) "EXEMPT LOT" MEANS A LOT THAT IS:
(a) NOT SERVED BY A DOMESTIC WATER AND SEWAGE TREATMENT
SYSTEM, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 24-65.1-104 (5);
-5- 1308

(b) SERVED BY A WELL THAT IS NOT CONNECTED TO A WATER
DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 25-9-102 (6);
(c) SERVED BY A SEPTIC TANK, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 25-10-103
(18);
(d) LOCATED WITHIN AN AIRPORT INFLUENCE AREA, AS DEFINED IN
SECTION 29-35-103; OR
(e) A HISTORIC PROPERTY THAT IS LOCATED OUTSIDE OF A
HISTORIC DISTRICT.
(3) "LIENHOLDER" MEANS THE HOLDER OF AN EVIDENCE OF DEBT.
(4) "LOT SPLIT" MEANS THE PROCESS OF SUBDIVIDING AN ORIGINAL
LOT INTO TWO NEW LOTS.
(5) "SUBJECT JURISDICTION" MEANS A MUNICIPALITY THAT:
(a) HAS A POPULATION OF ONE THOUSAND OR MORE, AS REPORTED
BY THE STATE DEMOGRAPHY OFFICE; AND
(b) IS WITHIN A METROPOLITAN PLANNING ORGANIZATION.
29-35-503. Lot splitting approval by subject jurisdictions.
(1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SECTION 29-35-504, ON OR AFTER
DECEMBER 31, 2027, SUBJECT TO AN ADMINISTRATIVE APPROVAL PROCESS
AND IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS PART 5, A SUBJECT JURISDICTION SHALL
APPROVE A LOT SPLIT OF AN ORIGINAL LOT INTO TWO NEW LOTS IF THE
FOLLOWING CONDITIONS ARE MET:
(a) THE LOT SPLIT DOES NOT CREATE A NEW LOT THAT IS SMALLER
THAN ONE THOUSAND TWO HUNDRED SQUARE FEET IN AREA;
(b) IF THE TWO NEW LOTS ARE NOT EQUAL IN AREA, THE AREA OF
THE SMALLER OF THE TWO NEW LOTS IS EQUAL TO OR GREATER THAN
THIRTY PERCENT OF THE AREA OF THE ORIGINAL LOT;
(c) THE ORIGINAL LOT WAS NEVER SUBJECT TO ANOTHER LOT SPLIT
-6- 1308

APPROVED THROUGH AN ADMINISTRATIVE APPROVAL PROCESS IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION;
(d) RESIDENTIAL USE IS ALLOWED ON THE ORIGINAL LOT;
(e) IT IS FEASIBLE FOR:
(I) BOTH OF THE NEW LOTS TO BE ACCESSED DUE TO ABUTMENT TO
A PUBLIC OR PRIVATE STREET OR BY USE OF AN ACCESS EASEMENT, WHICH
MAY INCLUDE SHARED COMMON ACCESS;
(II) UTILITY EASEMENTS TO SERVE BOTH NEW LOTS; AND
(III) BOTH NEW LOTS TO MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF ARTICLES
50, 51, 52, AND 53 OF TITLE 38;
(f) THE ORIGINAL LOT IS NOT AN EXEMPT LOT; AND
(g) THE ORIGINAL LOT IS NOT LOCATED WITHIN A COMMON
INTEREST COMMUNITY, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 38-33.3-103 (8), THAT WAS
CREATED ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2027.
(2) IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION, A
SUBJECT JURISDICTION MAY ESTABLISH PROCEDURES TO REVIEW AND
ACCEPT INFORMATION RELATED TO A PROPOSED LOT SPLIT, INCLUDING LOT
INFORMATION RELATED TO:
(a) PROPERTY OWNERSHIP;
(b) PHYSICAL CHARACTERISTICS OF THE LOT, INCLUDING GEOLOGY
AND SOILS;
(c) PROPOSED NEW LOT LINES AND NEW LOT AREAS;
(d) ADEQUACY OF WATER SUPPLY, SEWER SERVICE, AND DRAINAGE
SYSTEMS TO SERVE THE NEW LOTS;
(e) ADEQUACY OF ELECTRIC POWER AND NATURAL GAS SERVICE
TO SERVE THE NEW LOTS;
(f) DEDICATION FOR SCHOOLS, PARKS, STREETS, AND OTHER
-7- 1308

PUBLIC AREAS, OR PAYMENT OF MONEY IN LIEU OF SUCH DEDICATION; AND
(g) GUARANTEES OF NECESSARY PUBLIC IMPROVEMENTS.
(3) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION PREVENTS A SUBJECT JURISDICTION
FROM:
(a) APPLYING AND ENFORCING A LOCAL INFRASTRUCTURE
STANDARD, INCLUDING A STANDARD RELATED TO UTILITIES,
TRANSPORTATION, OR PUBLIC WORKS CODES;
(b) APPLYING AND ENFORCING A LOCAL LIFE SAFETY CODE,
INCLUDING A BUILDING, FIRE, UTILITY, OR STORMWATER CODE;
(c) APPLYING AND ENFORCING A REGULATION RELATED TO HUMAN
AND ENVIRONMENTAL HEALTH AND SAFETY, INCLUDING OIL AND GAS
SETBACKS, FLOODPLAIN REGULATIONS, AND AIRPORT INFLUENCE AREAS;
(d) APPLYING AND ENFORCING A LOCAL REGULATION RELATED TO
DEVELOPMENT, INCLUDING STORMWATER, IMPERVIOUS SURFACE AREA,
AND BUILDING COVERAGE STANDARDS;
(e) ADOPTING GENERALLY APPLICABLE REQUIREMENTS FOR THE
PAYMENT OF IMPACT FEES OR OTHER SIMILAR DEVELOPMENT CHARGES, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 29-20-104.5, OR FOR THE MITIGATION OF
IMPACTS IN ACCORDANCE WITH PART 2 OF ARTICLE 20 OF THIS TITLE 29;
(f) REQUIRING A STATEMENT BY A WATER OR WASTEWATER
SERVICE PROVIDER REGARDING THE PROVIDER'S CAPACITY TO SERVICE A
PARCEL;
(g) ENACTING OR APPLYING A LOCAL LAW CONCERNING A
SHORT-TERM RENTAL, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 29-35-402 (19); OR
(h) APPLYING THE DESIGN STANDARDS AND PROCEDURES OF A
HISTORIC DISTRICT TO A PARCEL LOCATED WITHIN A HISTORIC DISTRICT.
(4) A SUBJECT JURISDICTION:
-8- 1308

(a) SHALL NOT APPLY A SETBACK STANDARD THAT REQUIRES A
SETBACK FROM THE LOT LINE ADJOINING TWO NEW LOTS CREATED
THROUGH A LOT SPLIT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION IF NO
STRUCTURE EXISTED ON THE ORIGINAL LOT IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE
LOT SPLIT; AND
(b) MAY APPLY A SETBACK STANDARD THAT REQUIRES A SETBACK
FROM THE LOT LINE ADJOINING TWO NEW LOTS CREATED THROUGH A LOT
SPLIT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION IF A STRUCTURE EXISTED ON
THE ORIGINAL LOT IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE LOT SPLIT AND IF THE
SETBACK IS EQUAL TO OR LESS THAN FIVE FEET.
(5) NOTHING IN THIS PART 5 SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO SUPERSEDE,
INVALIDATE, OR LIMIT THE ENFORCEABILITY OF PRIVATE COVENANTS,
CONDITIONS, OR RESTRICTIONS RECORDED AGAINST THE ORIGINAL LOT,
EXCEPT AS EXPRESSLY PROVIDED BY LAW.
29-35-504. Consent of lienholder required prior to lot split.
(1) IF AN ORIGINAL LOT OR ANY STRUCTURE BUILT ON THE
ORIGINAL LOT IS SUBJECT TO AN EVIDENCE OF DEBT, THEN PRIOR TO
APPROVING A LOT SPLIT IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 29-35-503 (1), A
SUBJECT JURISDICTION SHALL VERIFY THAT THE LIENHOLDER HAS
RECEIVED NOTICE OF THE PROPOSED LOT SPLIT AND HAS CONSENTED TO
THE LOT SPLIT IN WRITING. THE LIENHOLDER MAY CONDITION CONSENT TO
THE LOT SPLIT ON THE SATISFACTION OF CONDITIONS SPECIFIED BY THE
LIENHOLDER.
(2) THE WRITTEN CONSENT OF THE LIENHOLDER MUST BE
EXECUTED IN A FORM THAT IS ELIGIBLE FOR RECORDING IN THE REAL
PROPERTY RECORDS OF THE COUNTY IN WHICH THE ORIGINAL LOT IS
LOCATED AND MUST INCLUDE THE FOLLOWING:
-9- 1308

(a) THE NOTARIZED SIGNATURE OF THE LIENHOLDER OR THE AGENT
OF THE LIENHOLDER;
(b) THE NAME OF THE RECORD OWNER OR GROUND LESSEE OF THE
ORIGINAL LOT;
(c) THE LEGAL DESCRIPTION OF THE ORIGINAL LOT;
(d) THE IDENTITIES OF ALL PARTIES WITH AN INTEREST IN THE
ORIGINAL LOT AS REFLECTED IN THE REAL PROPERTY RECORDS, INCLUDING
ANY EASEMENTS AND ENCUMBRANCES.
(3) THE WRITTEN CONSENT OF THE LIENHOLDER MUST BE
RECORDED IN THE OFFICE OF THE COUNTY RECORDER OF THE COUNTY IN
WHICH THE ORIGINAL LOT IS LOCATED.
(4) IF THE LIENHOLDER DOES NOT PROVIDE WRITTEN CONSENT TO
THE LOT SPLIT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION, THE SUBJECT
JURISDICTION SHALL NOT APPROVE THE LOT SPLIT. A LOT SPLIT THAT IS
APPROVED BEFORE THE WRITTEN CONSENT OF THE LIENHOLDER HAS BEEN
OBTAINED AND RECORDED IS VOID.
SECTION 2. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-10- 1308